fr: Têtes de Moine, Tête de Moine
de: Tête de Moine

en: Comté, Comté cheeses, Comté cheese from cow's milk
xx: Comté
bg: Комте
de: Comté, Comté-Käse, Comté-Käse aus Kuhmilch
fr: Comté

en: Grated emmentaler
de: Geriebener Emmentaler
fi: raastettu emmental
fr: Emmentals râpés, emmental râpé, emmenthal râpé
hr: Ribani ementaler
it: Emmental grattugiato
nl: Gemalen emmentalers

en: French emmentaler
bg: френски ементал
de: Französischer Emmentaler
es: Emmentaler francés
fi: ranskalainen emmental
fr: Emmentals français
hr: Francuski ementaler
hu: Francia ementálé
it: Emmental francese
nl: Franse emmentalers

en: Emmentals of Savoy
de: Emmentaler aus Savoy
fr: Emmentals de Savoie
hr: Savojski ementali
nl: Emmental uit de Savoie

en: Pont-l'évêque
xx: Pont-l'Évêque
de: Pont-l'évêque
es: Pont-l'évêque
fr: Pont-l'évêque
hr: Pont-l'évêque
it: Pont-l'évêque
ja: ポン・レヴェック
nl: Pont-l'Évêque

en: Reblochon, Reblochon cheeses, Reblochon cheese from cow's milk
xx: Reblochon
bg: Реблошон
de: Reblochon
fr: Reblochons, Reblochon, Reblochons de Savoie, Reblochon de Savoie
hr: Reblochon
it: Formaggio Reblochon
ja: ルブロション

en: Cypriot cheeses, Cheeses from Cyprus
de: Zypriotische Käsesorten
es: Quesos chipriotas
fr: Fromages chypriotes
hr: Ciparski sirevi
it: Formaggi ciprioti
nl: Kazen uit Cyprus, Cypriotische kazen

en: Grilling cheeses, Cheeses to grill, cheeses for grilling, Baking cheeses
de: Grillkäse
fr: Fromages à griller
hr: Pečenje sireva na roštilju
nl: Grillkazen, Baking cheeses
pl: Sery na grilla, Sery do grillowania

en: Halloumi
xx: Halloumi
bg: Халуми
de: Halloumi
el: Χαλλούμι, Hellim, Halloumi
es: Halloumi
fr: Halloumi
hr: Halloumi
it: Halloumi
ja: ハルーミ, ハロウミ
nl: Halloumi
sv: Halloumi

en: Bulgarian cheeses, cheeses from Bulgaria
bg: Български сирена
de: Bulgarische Käsesorten, Käse aus Bulgarien
es: Quesos búlgaros, quesos de Bulgaria
fr: Fromages de Bulgarie, Fromages bulgares
hr: Bugarski sirevi
it: Formaggi bulgari, formaggi dalla Bulgaria
nl: Bulgaarse kazen, kazen uit Bulgarije

en: Bulgarian white brine cheese
bg: Българско бяло саламурено сирене

en: Greek cheeses, cheeses from Greece
bg: Гръцки сирена
de: Griechischer Käse
es: Quesos griegos, quesos de Grecia
fi: kreikkalaiset juustot
fr: Fromages de Grèce, Fromages grecs
hr: Grčki sirevi
hu: Görög sajtok
it: Formaggi greci
lt: Graikiški sūriai, sūriai iš graikijos
nl: Griekse kazen
pl: Sery greckie, Sery z Grecji

en: Feta
xx: Feta
bg: Фета
de: Feta
el: Φέτα, Feta
es: Feta
fi: feta
fr: Feta
hr: Feta
hu: Feta sajtok
it: Feta
ja: フェタチーズ, フェタ
nl: Fetas, Feta's
pl: Feta, Ser feta

en: Feta cubes
bg: Фета на кубчета
de: Feta Würfel
fr: Cubes de feta
hr: Feta kocke
it: Cubetti di feta
pl: Feta w kostkach, Ser feta w kostkach

en: Feta blocs
fr: Blocs de feta

en: Feta-type cheese
nl: Witte kazen, witte kaas
pl: Ser typu feta

en: Feta-type cheese from cow's milk
fr: Fromage type feta au lait de vache

en: Feta-type cheese from cow's milk in oil and spices
fr: Fromage type feta au lait de vache à l'huile et aux aromates

en: Graviera
el: Γραβιέρα